Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 4 Allocation of Gas and Electricity to Protect Public Health and Safety

Administrative rules and regulations.

Disconnection of gas or electric utility service, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapter 515-3-2.

46-2-70.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Corporation” means any private corporation, municipal corporation, joint-stock company, partnership, association, business trust, or other organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not, or a receiver or trustee of any of the foregoing.

“Person” means an individual or a corporation.

“Utility” means any person who supplies, furnishes, or sells a utility service.

“Utility service” means gas or electricity which is supplied, sold, or furnished by any person subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 470, § 1.

46-2-71.
Power of commission to allocate utility service and to alter, amend, suspend, or terminate existing rates, schedules, contracts, rules, or regulations; findings required before commission exercises powers of allocation.

Subject to subsection (b) of this Code section, the commission shall have the power and authority to allocate any utility service in such manner as it deems proper in order to protect the public health, safety, or welfare, including for such purposes the power and authority to alter, amend, suspend, or terminate any existing rate, schedule, contract, rule, or regulation affecting such utility service and to prescribe new or additional rates, schedules, contracts, rules, or regulations affecting such utility service, provided that in any event such rates, schedules, contracts, rules, or regulations as are altered, amended, or prescribed by the commission shall be just and reasonable.

Before the commission may exercise the power and authority granted by subsection (a) of this Code section, it must:

Find, after a hearing respecting the manner, if any, in which the commission should exercise such power and authority, as well as the necessity therefor, such hearing to be initiated by the commission on its own motion or by any person and to be preceded by notice to the persons affected, that there exists a shortage in the quantities of such utility service available in this state or in any portion of the state, or that such a shortage is imminent, and that it is necessary for the commission to exercise such power and authority in order to protect the public health, safety, or welfare; or

Find that an emergency exists with respect to the quantities of such utility service available in this state or in any portion of the state, and that it is necessary for the commission to exercise such power and authority in order to protect the public health, safety, or welfare before notice and hearing can be afforded to the persons affected; provided, however, that the directives, rulings, and orders of the commission respecting such utility service based upon a finding that an emergency exists pursuant to this paragraph shall be temporary and provisional and the commission shall, as soon as practicable under the circumstances, afford notice and hearing to the persons affected as to whether such directives, rulings, or orders of the commission shall be continued, modified, made permanent, or otherwise affected.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 470, § 2.

Cross references.

Limitation on power of Governor upon declaration of state of energy emergency, §

38-3-51(h)

.

46-2-72.
Immunity from liability of persons acting in accordance with ruling or order of commission entered pursuant to Code Section 46-2-71.

Any person who supplies, furnishes, sells, limits, withholds, receives, or otherwise acts with respect to any utility service in accordance with a directive, ruling, or order entered by the commission pursuant to the authority granted by Code Section 46-2-71 will not be held liable to any other person by reason thereof in any action at law or in equity.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 470, § 3.